Arkansas statutes. Title 22 Public Property
Chapter 4

Parks and Recreation Areas

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1971, No. 38, § 7, transferred, by a type 4 transfer, the State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission, together with its functions, powers, and duties, to the Department of Parks and Tourism. Pursuant to the transfer, the Governor is authorized, under §25-2-107, to give written approval of the rules and regulations promulgated by the State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission as well as approval of the commission's nomination for Director of the Department of Parks and Tourism, who shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

Cross References.

State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission, §15-11-201 et seq.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1937, No. 170, § 15: Mar. 3, 1937. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, the conservation and promotion of the human and natural resources is recognized as a public right and duty; and

“Whereas, the General Assembly deems the acquiring and maintaining of an adequate state park system as necessary to the well-being of the people of this state; and

“Whereas, it is found and ascertained that the welfare of the people of this state is dependent upon the provisions of this act, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act shall become effective and be in force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1977, No. 842, § 11: Mar. 24, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that various Arkansas State parks are in dire need of construction, reconstruction, repairing, improving and equipping of facilities and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to continue funds and appropriations for initiating said projects. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

22-4-101. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)

“Land” means upland; land under water; the water of any lake, pond, or stream; any and all incorporeal hereditaments; and every estate, interest, and right, either legal or equitable, in land or water, including terms for years, liens thereon by way of judgment, mortgage, or otherwise, and all claims for damages to such property; and

(2)

“Park” means any area within the state which by reason of location, natural features, scenic beauty, or historical interest possesses distinctive physical, aesthetic, intellectual, creative, and social values.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 170, § 10; Pope's Dig., § 12316; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-606.

22-4-102. Control of state parks and recreational areas.

All parks and recreational areas acquired by the state shall constitute the state parks system and shall be under the immediate control and management of the State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 170, § 6; Pope's Dig., § 12312; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-601.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2005, No. 1225, § 1, amended uncodified Acts 1957, No. 564, § 1 to read:

“The Department of Parks and Tourism is hereby authorized to establish a state park to be known as the Hampson Archeological Museum State Park, if

“(1)

Suitable land for such park, in amount and location is donated to the Department of Parks and Tourism, without cost, with title to such land to be vested in fee simple in the State of Arkansas, and

“(2)

The various relics, exhibits and other contents of the Hampson Memorial Museum of Archeology in Mississippi County near Wilson are donated to the Department of Parks and Tourism to be used and maintained in the Hampson Archeological Museum State Park.”

Publisher's Notes.

The following parks were established by the acts indicated:

Arkansas Post National Memorial. Acts 1981, Nos. 243 and 263.

Hampson Museum State Park. Acts 1957, No. 564.

Hurricane Creek State Park. Acts 1963, No. 550.

Herman Davis Memorial Park. Acts 1953, No. 369.

Jacksonport State Park. Acts 1963, No. 554.

James Sevier Conway Historical Monument. Acts 1975, No. 329.

Jenkins Ferry Battleground State Park. Acts 1961, No. 10.

Louisiana Purchase State Park. Acts 1961, No. 174.

Marks' Mills Battleground. Acts 1961, No. 164.

Moro Bay State Park. Acts 1967, No. 425.

Mt. Magazine State Park. Acts 1983, No. 884.

Old Carrollton State Park. Acts 1959, No. 79.

Parkin Indian Mound State Park. Acts 1967, No. 399.

Parnell Springs State Park. Acts 1963, No. 553.

Pea Ridge National Park. Acts 1957, No. 192.

Pioneer Washington State Historical Monument. Acts 1965, No. 396.

Poinsett State Park. Acts 1963, No. 551.

Poison Springs Battleground State Park. Acts 1961, No. 182.

Sans Souci Landing. Acts 1967, No. 438.

Upper Strawberry River Watershed Area. Acts 1975, No. 685.

White Oak State Park. Acts 1969, No. 192.

Woolley Hollow Recreation Center. Acts 1971, No. 378.

Acts 1937, No. 170, established the Arkansas State Parks Commission. Acts 1945, No. 138, § 3, abolished the commission and transferred its duties to the Arkansas Resources and Development Commission, to be exercised by the Division of Forestry and Parks of the commission. The division was abolished and its duties relating to state parks were transferred to the State Forestry and Parks Commission by Acts 1953, No. 42, and thereafter transferred to the Publicity and Parks Commission by Acts 1955, No. 330. The Publicity and Parks Commission was redesignated the State Parks, Recreation and Travel Commission by Acts 1969, No. 85. The commission subsequently was transferred, together with its functions, powers, and duties, by a type 4 transfer to the State Department of Parks and Tourism pursuant to Acts 1971, No. 38.

22-4-103. State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission — Powers generally.

The State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission, in addition to the other powers granted in this chapter, shall have the sole authority:

(1)(A)

To acquire in the name of the state by purchase, lease, or agreement such land within the state as it may deem necessary or proper for the extension, development, or improvement of the state park system.

(B)

If the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism is unable to agree with the owner of the land, or if by legal incapacity or absence of the owner, no agreement can be made for the purchase, the land may be acquired by condemnation proceedings instituted in the name of the state in the manner provided by law for the condemnation of property for public purposes.

(C)

No land shall be taken or contracted to be taken for an amount beyond the sum available therefor, and no tender shall be required for property taken by condemnation proceedings until the amount required to be paid is ascertained by the court sitting as a jury for the purpose of determining the value of the property condemned;

(2)

To take in its discretion in fee or otherwise, by gift or devise, land for state park and recreational purposes and to receive gifts, bequests, or contributions of money or other property to be used in extending, improving, or maintaining the state parks system;

(3)

To apply to the Commissioner of State Lands for the transfer of any state-owned land or land the title to which has reverted to the state by reason of tax delinquency and which is deemed by the department as suitable and desirable for park and recreational purposes. The Commissioner of State Lands is authorized and directed to make such transfers which shall operate as an appropriation of the land for park and recreational purposes forever and shall be a bar to any grants by the state of the land so transferred or of any interest in it for any purpose whatsoever;

(4)

To accept transfers and conveyances of rights and titles vested in the United States Government to land and buildings within this state for state park and recreational purposes or to lease them, under such conditions as the United States Government may impose;

(5)

To make expenditures from funds available for the care, supervision, improvement, development, and protection of the state parks system;

(6)

To remove or cause to be removed and to sell wood, timber, rocks, stone, or other products from the parks. All moneys received from the sale of those items shall be paid into the general fund of the State Treasury;

(7)

To cooperate with counties, municipalities, and other political subdivisions of the state, with other states, and with the federal government in matters relating to planning, establishing, developing, improving, or maintaining any park, parkway, or recreational area;

(8)

To appoint local and regional park and recreational councils to consider, study, and advise in the work of the commission for the extension, development, use, and maintenance of the parks for which appointed. The Chair of the State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission and the Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism shall be ex officio members of all councils so appointed; and

(9)

To confer on employees of the department the full authority of peace officers for all land under its jurisdiction and to confer on a certified law enforcement officer employed by the commission the authority to enforce the laws of the state, as permitted by law, anywhere within the state.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 170, § 6; Pope's Dig., § 12312; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-601; Acts 2017, No. 202, § 2; 2019, No. 910, §§
5690-5692.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment added “and to confer on a certified law enforcement officer employed by the commission the authority to enforce the laws of the state, as permitted by law, anywhere within the state” in (9).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Department of Parks and Tourism” in (1)(B), (3), and (8); and substituted “Secretary” for “Director” in (8).

22-4-104. State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission — Rule-making power — Penalty.

(a)

The State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission may establish and alter rules governing the use and protection of the state parks system and the property thereon and to preserve the peace therein.

(b)

A person who violates a rule established under subsection (a) of this section shall be guilty of an unclassified misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of at least one hundred dollars ($100) and not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisonment for not more than thirty (30) days, or both.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 170, § 6; Pope's Dig., § 12312; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-601; Acts 2011, No. 745, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

As to approval of rules and regulations, see Publisher's Notes following subchapter analysis.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a); in (b), substituted “a rule” for “any rule or regulation” and “of at least” for “not exceeding,” and inserted “and not more than five hundred dollars ($500)”.

22-4-105. Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism — Leasing powers.

(a)

The Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism, in addition to any other powers granted in this chapter, shall have the sole authority to lease state park lands to private companies and to authorize the lessees to construct, maintain, and operate overnight accommodation facilities, recreational facilities, and the other major facilities which the department may deem appropriate.

(b)

Any lease executed by the department shall include provisions satisfactory to the department regarding the quality of services and facilities to be furnished by the lessee and the charges to be made therefor, or provisions reserving to the department the right to monitor and inspect the activities and facilities of the lessee to assure that the quality of the services and facilities provided by the lessee and the prices charged therefor are appropriate.

(c)

Failure of any lessee to comply with the terms of a lease or the reasonable requirements of the department regarding the quality of services and facilities provided by the lessee or the charges to be made therefor shall be grounds for the department to terminate the lease.

(d)

Each lease shall be for a term not to exceed twenty-five (25) years, and the lessee may be permitted to renew the lease for an additional period not to exceed twenty-five (25) years.

(e)

No long-term lease shall be entered into by the department unless it is approved by the State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission and the Legislative Council.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 170, § 6; Pope's Dig., § 12312; Acts 1977, No. 253, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-601; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5693.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Department of Parks and Tourism” in (a).

22-4-106. Establishing and acquiring property for state parks — Procedure generally.

(a)

The Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism and the State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission are directed to consult with and seek the advice of the Governor, the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration, and the Legislative Council before establishing and acquiring properties for new state parks or before making acquisitions of real property for additions to or expansions of existing state parks which have not been specifically authorized or funded by the General Assembly.

(b)

The advice of the Governor, the secretary, and the Legislative Council shall be sought in writing by the department or the commission at least sixty (60) days prior to the final approval by the commission of any formal action to establish a new state park or to make acquisitions of real property for additions to or expansions of existing state parks if the action has not previously received specific legislative authorization.

(c)

If the Governor notifies the department or the commission in writing of his or her disapproval of any project, then the project shall not be undertaken unless specifically authorized by law at a subsequent legislative session.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 842, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-602; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5694.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Department of Parks and Tourism” and “Secretary” for “Director” in (a).

22-4-107. Reservation of parks for public use.

(a)

All parks acquired by the state shall forever be reserved and maintained by the state for the use and enjoyment of the public.

(b)

It shall be the duty of the State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission to preserve the parks in their natural condition so far as may be consistent with their use and safety and to improve them in such manner as not to lessen their natural, scenic, historic, and wildlife values.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 170, § 11; Pope's Dig., § 12317; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-607.

22-4-108. Sale or exchange of lands.

(a)

The State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission is given authority to exchange any lands now belonging to the state for state park purposes for other lands that are suitable for such purposes and to sell any lands belonging to the state for state park purposes and invest the proceeds thereof in other lands suitable for such purposes, such sale or exchange to be had only with the approval of the Governor.

(b)

In case of a sale or exchange of such lands, the Chair of the State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission and the Secretary of the State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission are empowered to execute a deed fully conveying the interest of the state therein. The deed shall bear the endorsement of the approval of the Governor and shall not be required to be acknowledged.

(c)

This authority to sell and exchange shall extend only to lands which the commission finds are unsuited for state park purposes.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 170, § 14; Pope's Dig., § 12319; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-608.

22-4-109. Acquisition of land for hiking trails.

(a)

The Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism is authorized to acquire, by purchase, gift, or devise, interest in real property less than fee interest, including, but not limited to, easements for the purpose of establishing trails for public hiking and for related purposes over lands contiguous to lands controlled by the department.

(b)

The interest in real property less than fee interest shall be acquired solely by gift or devise from the owner of the interest or by negotiating and contracting with the owner for the interest.

(c)

Under no circumstances shall the interest be acquired by the department under the power of eminent domain.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 243, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-603; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5695.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Department of Parks and Tourism” in (a).

22-4-110. Expenditures and contributions of counties, cities, or towns.

(a)

Any county, city, or town may expend money from any funds available to aid in the purchase of land within the county which, when purchased, shall become the property of the state to be cared for and administered as a part of the state parks system, but only if the State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission has first agreed in writing to the acceptance of the land.

(b)

Any county, city, or town may annually contribute money to the commission from any funds available to be expended in the care, improvement, and maintenance of any park within the county.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 170, § 7; Pope's Dig., § 12313; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-604.

22-4-111. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning the annual report of the State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission, was repealed by Acts 2013, No. 1463, § 1. This section was derived from Acts 1937, No. 170, § 9; Pope's Dig., § 12315; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-605.

22-4-112. Lower White River Museum State Park.

The Prairie County Museum State Park is renamed the Lower White River Museum State Park.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1155, § 1.

22-4-113. Use of certain vehicles by person with a disability document and valid driver's license — Definitions.

(a)

As used in this section:

(1)

“All-terrain vehicle” has the same meaning as in §27-21-102;

(2)

“Disability document” means:

(A)

An Arkansas license plate beginning with the letters “DV” or “DAV”;

(B)

A license plate or certificate from any state that displays:

(i)

The international symbol of access;

(ii)

The word “disabled”; or

(iii)

Both the international symbol of access and the word “disabled”;

(C)

An America the Beautiful Access Pass or America the Beautiful Golden Access Passport; or

(D)

A disability document from the Social Security Administration or the United States Department of Veterans Affairs establishing a determination of a mobility-based disability; and

(3)

“Recreation use area” means:

(A)

A campground;

(B)

A day-use or picnic area; and

(C)

Cabin and lodge areas.

(b)(1)(A)

A person who has a disability document and a valid driver's license may operate an all-terrain vehicle or a golf cart on roads only within developed recreation use areas located within a park and recreational area under the control and management of the State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission.

(B)

The authority to operate an all-terrain vehicle or a golf cart under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section includes Arkansas Department of Transportation drives designated as the State Highway (S.H.) 600 Series within the state parks and recreational areas.

(2)

A person shall not operate an all-terrain vehicle or golf cart from one recreation-use area to another.

(c)

An all-terrain vehicle or golf cart that is operated from one-half (½) hour after sunset and one-half (½) hour before sunrise or any other time when there is insufficient light to render clearly discernible persons at a distance of five hundred feet (500') shall have proper lights on the all-terrain vehicle or golf cart.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 221, § 1; 2017, No. 707, §
81; 2019, No. 236, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department” in (b)(1)(B).

The 2019 amendment rewrote the introductory language of (a)(2)(B), and added (a)(2)(B)(i) through (A)(2)(B)(iii), and made a stylistic change.

Subchapter 2

— Classification

22-4-201. Classifications of state parks.

The State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission shall classify each state park into one (1) of the following classifications:

(1)

Official state parks shall be those parks which the commission determines to have sufficient facilities and recreational and tourist attractions to meet standards established by the commission for designation as a state park;

(2)

State historical monuments shall be those facilities presently classified as state parks which shall be reclassified as state historical monuments because of their historical value and attractiveness with respect to the history of Arkansas and of the Southwest but which do not have facilities meeting the standards of the commission to be classified as state parks;

(3)

State museums shall consist of those facilities presently classified as state parks which shall be reclassified as state museums because of the nature of the facilities and the exhibits and attractions thereof which justify classification as a state museum rather than a state park;

(4)

State recreational areas shall be all other facilities now classified as state parks which do not have the facilities to justify classification as a state park under the standards established by the commission but which do offer limited or specialized recreational facilities of interest and attraction to the public; and

(5)

State arboretums shall consist of those arboretums classified as state parks but not included in any other classification under this section.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 37, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-610; Acts 1991, No. 1039, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1965, No. 37, § 1, authorized the former Arkansas Publicity and Parks Commission, now the State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission, to make a study and review of all parks designated by law or regulation as state parks to determine the facilities, recreational and tourist attractions, historical attractiveness of each park and such other general information as required by the commission in classifying each park in the manner provided in this subchapter.

22-4-202. Reclassification of state parks.

The State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission shall periodically review the classification or designation of state parks as provided in §22-4-201 and may reclassify any park when the commission determines that the facilities, attractions, public use, or recreational values thereof justify a reclassification under standards promulgated by the commission.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 37, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-611.

22-4-203. Effect of classification or reclassification.

(a)

All state parks classified by the State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission under the provisions of §22-4-201, or reclassified under the provisions of §22-4-202, shall continue to be a part of the state parks system. Any reclassification shall be for the purpose of more proper classification and identification in order that the public might be better advised with respect to each facility in its selection or use thereof.

(b)

Nothing in this subchapter shall affect the powers of the commission to issue revenue bonds for the improvement of any facility in the state parks system, or the pledge of revenues therefrom, regardless of classification by the commission under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 37, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-612.

Subchapter 3

— Revenue Bonds and Other Funds

Effective Dates.

Acts 1953, No. 399, § 12: approved Mar. 28, 1953. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared that the State of Arkansas does not now have a sufficient program of State Parks and that such program is needed and should be put in force as soon as possible to the end that the people of Arkansas may have adequate recreational facilities and that residents of other states may be attracted to the state. In consequence of such facts, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, rendering this act necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety. This act shall therefore take effect and be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage.”

Acts 1957, No. 279, § 9: Mar. 27, 1957. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is hereby declared by the General Assembly that immediate action is necessary in order to accomplish the purpose of this act and that delay will probably result in excessive interest costs on bonds issued pursuant to this act and further that moneys to be derived from the sale of such bonds are badly needed at this time in order to accomplish the purpose of this act. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1970 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 35, § 4: Mar. 13, 1970. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is hereby declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the financing of the public improvements to which this act pertains is not feasible under existing maximum interest rate limitations, that the accomplishment of these public improvements is essential to the continued development of this state and the continued improvement of this state and the continued improvement of the economic conditions of her people, and that these public improvements can be accomplished only by the immediate effect of this act. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 225, § 26: became law without Governor's signature, Feb. 19, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is hereby declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the financing of the public improvements to which this act pertains is not feasible under existing maximum interest rate limitations, that the accomplishment of these public improvements is essential to the continued development of this state and the continued improvement of the economic conditions of her people, and that these public improvements can be accomplished only by the immediate effect of this act. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1980 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 71, § 7: Feb. 12, 1980. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Acts 1977, No. 310, as amended, provides for the establishment of the Arkansas Oil and Brine Museum but that funds are not currently available for the construction of the Museum; that this act is designed to authorize the Parks, Recreation and Travel Commission to issue bonds for the construction of the Museum, and to pledge funds derived from a fee of twenty (20) mills per barrel levied by this act on oil produced in the state and ten (10) cents per 1,000 barrels of brine produced in this state for the purpose of bromine extraction; that it is urgent that this act be given effect at the earliest possible date to enable the Commission to proceed with the issuance of bonds and the construction of the Museum. Therefore, an emergency is hearby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 425, § 54: Mar. 11, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is hereby declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the financing of the public improvements to which this act pertains is not feasible under existing maximum interest rate limitations, that the accomplishment of these public improvements is essential to the continued development of this state and the continued improvement of the economic conditions of her people, and that these public improvements can be accomplished only by the immediate effect of this act. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in effect from and after its passage and approval.”

22-4-301. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning the supchapter as a complete authority, was repealed by Acts 2001, No. 1390, § 1. The section was derived from Acts 1957, No. 279, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-623.

22-4-302. Financing authority.

The State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission is authorized and empowered to obtain the necessary funds for the purpose of extending, developing, and improving the state parks system from any source or sources necessary and consistent with this subchapter, §22-4-101 et seq., and §22-4-201 et seq., including, without limitation, contracting with the Arkansas Development Finance Authority to provide for the issuance of bonds by the authority in accordance with the Arkansas Development Finance Authority Act, §15-5-101 et seq., §§15-5-201 —15-5-211,15-5-213, and §§15-5-301 —15-5-316.

History.

Acts 1953, No. 399, § 1; 1957, No. 279, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-613; Acts 2001, No. 1390, § 2.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1985, No. 1062, § 24, provided, in part, that the authority of the State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission to issue revenue bonds pursuant to Acts 1953, No. 399 was transferred to the Arkansas Development Finance Authority and that from May 1, 1985, the issuer of revenue bonds pursuant to Acts 1953, No. 399 means the Authority.

Amendments.

The 2001 amendment rewrote this section.

22-4-303, 22-4-304. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

These sections, concerning the issuance and terms of bonds and the sale of bonds, were repealed by Acts 2001, No. 1390, §§ 3 and 4, respectively. The sections were derived from the following sources:

22-4-303. Acts 1953, No. 399, § 3; 1970 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 35, § 1; 1975, No. 225, § 8; 1981, No. 425, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-615.

22-4-304. Acts 1953, No. 399, §§ 1, 3; 1957, No. 279, § 1; 1970 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 35, § 1; 1975, No. 225, § 8; 1981, No. 425, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 9-613, 9-615.

22-4-305. Authority of State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission to impose fees for services — Pledge of revenues from fees — Restrictions.

(a)

The State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission is authorized and directed to prescribe and collect reasonable fees, rates, tolls, and charges for the services, facilities, and commodities rendered by the properties and equipment of the state parks system.

(b)

The authority and power of the commission includes the right to erect and operate cabins, lodges, restaurants, and other facilities and improvements for the convenience of the public and the right to erect and lease to third parties for operation such facilities and improvements upon such terms as the commission may determine.

(c)(1)

The commission shall revise the rates, fees, tolls, charges, and rentals whenever necessary to ensure that the revenues therefrom, together with other available funds, shall be fully sufficient to discharge all obligations of the commission pertaining to the principal of and interest on any bonds as the principal and interest become due.

(2)

The gross revenue derived by the commission from all or any part of the properties and equipment of the state parks system may be pledged to the payment of revenue bonds authorized to be issued by this subchapter even though the proceeds from a particular bond issue may be used for the development or improvement of one (1) or more, but less than all, state parks.

(d)

The bonds shall not constitute an indebtedness of the commission or of the State of Arkansas within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory limitation, and this shall be so stated on the face of each bond.

History.

Acts 1953, No. 399, §§ 1, 2; 1957, No. 279, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 9-613, 9-614; Acts 2001, No. 1390, § 5.

Publisher's Notes.

As to transfer of authority to issue bonds, see Publisher's Notes to §22-4-302.

Amendments.

The 2001 amendment substituted “State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission” for “commission” in (a); deleted “including, without limitation, the right to enter into long-term leases running for the life of any bond issue” at the end of (b); and deleted (d)(2) and made related changes.

22-4-306. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning remedies of bondholders, was repealed by Acts 2001, No. 1390, § 6. The section was derived from Acts 1953, No. 399, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-616.

22-4-307. Bonds and property — Exemptions.

All of the property controlled and operated by the State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission and the interest on all bonds issued under this subchapter shall be exempt from taxation by the State of Arkansas or by any municipal corporation, county, or other political subdivision or taxing district of the state.

History.

Acts 1953, No. 399, §§ 6, 7; 1957, No. 279, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 9-617, 9-618; Acts 2001, No. 1390, § 7.

Publisher's Notes.

As to transfer of authority to issue bonds, see Publisher's Notes to §22-4-302.

Amendments.

The 2001 amendment deleted (b) and made related changes.

22-4-308, 22-4-309. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

These sections, concerning refunding bonds and bonds as authorized investments, were repealed by Acts 2001, No. 1390, §§ 8 and 9, respectively. These sections were derived from the following sources:

22-4-308. Acts 1953, No. 399, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-620.

22-4-309. Acts 1953, No. 399, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-619.

22-4-310. Parks system revenues kept separate — Use of funds.

(a)

The following revenues and moneys are determined and declared to be cash funds which the State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission shall hold as separate funds and deposit in trust in any banks or depositories, other than the State Treasury, which the commission may select:

(1)

The gross revenue derived by the commission from the properties and equipment of the state parks system;

(2)

The moneys received by the commission from the sale of any wood, timber, rocks, stone, water, or other products from the state parks;

(3)

The moneys received by the commission from the sale of any state park lands, facilities, and improvements;

(4)

All moneys received by the commission as proceeds of insurance policies on any of the properties and equipment of the state parks system; and

(5)

All moneys received for state parks purposes from federal means, grants, contributions, gratuities, or reimbursements or from contributions, grants, or gratuities donated by private persons, corporations, or organizations which are subject to restrictions imposed by the respective federal agencies, private persons, corporations, or organizations furnishing these moneys.

(b)

All such revenues and moneys shall be subject to payment out of the funds for state parks purposes, including the payment of the principal and interest on revenue bonds issued by the Arkansas Development Finance Authority in the manner and at such times as the commission may direct.

History.

Acts 1953, No. 399, § 10; 1957, No. 279, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-621; Acts 2001, No. 1390, § 10.

Amendments.

The 2001 amendment substituted “revenue bonds issued by the Arkansas Development Finance Authority” for “bonds” in (b) and made minor stylistic changes.

22-4-311. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning the use of appropriated funds, was repealed by Acts 2001, No. 1390, § 11. The section was derived from Acts 1957, No. 279, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-622.

22-4-312. Bonds for construction of Arkansas Museum of Natural Resources.

(a)

The State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission may, in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter, issue bonds in an amount not to exceed two million dollars ($2,000,000) for the purpose of providing funds for the construction of the Arkansas Museum of Natural Resources as provided for in §§13-5-401 —13-5-404 and26-58-301 and, to secure the bonds, may pledge all funds derived from a fee of twenty (20) mills per barrel of oil produced in this state and a fee of ten cents (10¢) per one thousand (1,000) barrels of brine produced in this state for the purpose of bromine extraction as provided in §26-58-303.

(b)

Bonds so issued shall not constitute an indebtedness of the commission or of the State of Arkansas within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory limitation, and this shall be so stated on the face of each bond.

History.

Acts 1980 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 71, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-623.1.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1985, No. 1062, § 24, provided, in part, that the authority of the State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission to issue revenue bonds pursuant to Acts 1980 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 71 was transferred to the Arkansas Development Finance Authority and that from May 1, 1985, the issuer of revenue bonds pursuant to Acts 1980 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 71 means the Authority.

22-4-313. Bonds for construction of lodge and cabins.

(a)

The State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission, in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter, may contract with the Arkansas Development Finance Authority to provide for the issuance of bonds by the authority for the purpose of providing funds for the design, construction, and equipping of a lodge and cabins and related facilities and improvements to be located in Mount Magazine State Park and to provide funds for reasonable financing costs, including costs of issuance, capitalized interest, and a debt service reserve fund.

(b)

In order to secure the bonds, the commission is authorized to pledge to pay debt service on the bonds, the fees, rates, tolls, and charges for the services, facilities, and commodities rendered by the properties and equipment of the state parks system pursuant to §22-4-305.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1390, § 12.

Publisher's Notes.

Former §§22-4-313 and22-4-314, concerning fee reductions for “Golden Age Passport” holders and for elderly persons and totally disabled veterans, were repealed by Acts 1993, No. 278, § 1. The sections were derived from the following sources:

22-4-313. Acts 1977, No. 335, § 1; 1979, No. 204, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-614.1.

22-4-314. Acts 1977, No. 385, § 1; 1979, No. 321, § 1; 1985, No. 155, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 9-614.2, 9-614.3.